Maine, session 132, LD1103.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §15689-B, sub-§6, as amended by PL 2021, c. 213, §1, is
further amended to read:
6. Balance of allocations. Notwithstanding any other law, general operating fund
balances at the end of a school administrative unit's fiscal year must be carried forward to
meet the unit's needs in the next year or over a period not to exceed 3 years. Unallocated
balances in excess of 5% of the previous fiscal year's school budget must be used to reduce
the state and local share of the total allocation for the purpose of computing state subsidy.
School boards may carry forward unallocated balances in excess of 5% of the previous
year's school budget and disburse these funds in the next year or over a period not to exceed
3 years. For fiscal years 2021-22, 2022-23, 2023-24 and 2024-25 only, unallocated
balances in excess of 9% of the previous fiscal year's school budget must be used to reduce
the state and local share of the total allocation for the purpose of computing state subsidy
and school. School boards may carry forward unallocated balances in excess of 9% of the
previous fiscal year's school budget and disburse these funds in the next year or over a
period not to exceed 3 years.
Page 1 - 132LR0811(03)